Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
STATE WORKFORCE COST CONTAINMENT
(Review of reclassifications)
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “legislative review agency” has  the meaning
given that term in ORS 291.371.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall submit a report each cal-
endar quarter for review by the  legislative review agency on the reclassification of state
positions, including which positions were filled at the time of the reclassification and the
difference in compensation that results from  each reclassification. The legislative review
agency shall take data reported under this subsection into  account in making any appropri-
ation or expenditure limitation recommendation or any allocation determination.
(Review of long term vacancies)
SECTION 2.
 ORS 291.263 is amended to read:
291.263. (1) As used in this section, “state agency” includes any state officer,  department, board,
commission or court, the Legislative Assembly, its committees, officers and employees.
(2) A state agency shall  inform the Oregon Department of Administrative Services of any posi-
tion that has remained vacant for a continuous period of six months  by including a report on the
position in the estimate submitted  to the department under ORS 291.242. The department may con-
sider the vacancy  in its determinations under ORS 291.244 and may reduce the amount allotted to
the state agency.
(3) The department shall, on or before February 1 of each year, provide a  report to the
Legislative Fiscal Officer of any position that has remained vacant for  a continuous period
of at least six months. The department shall include  in the report the amount and source
of funds for the position. For  each position included on a previous report under this sub-
section, the department shall notify  the Legislative Fiscal Officer of conditions that affect
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 1
the position, including recruitment actions, filling  the position or using the position for
purposes other than what was anticipated in the legislatively approved budget. The Legisla-
tive Fiscal Officer shall review the list  and make recommendations on adjustments to agency
position authority to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means.
(Report on collective bargaining rollup
costs and addition of steps in ranges)
SECTION 3.
 ORS 291.371, as amended by section  34, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
291.371. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Legislative review agency” means the Joint Committee on Ways and  Means during the pe-
riod when the Legislative  Assembly is in session and the Emergency Board or the Joint Interim
Committee on Ways and Means during the interim period between sessions.
(b) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.002.
(2) Prior to making any changes in  a compensation plan, the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall submit the proposed changes[ , including step  pay increases, ] to the legislative
review agency.  The proposed changes to be submitted to  the legislative review agency include:
(a) Step pay increases;
(b) Cost of living adjustments;
(c) The addition of steps in position pay ranges;
(d) Any other actions that have an economic effect on a salary plan; and
(e) Estimates of the  total cost of any salary plan changes for the current biennium and
the next full biennium.
(3)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may  approve the reallocation of posi-
tions or the establishment of new positions not specifically  provided for in the budget of the affected
state agency if it finds that the proposed change:
(A) Can be financed by the state agency within the limits of its  biennial budget and legislatively
approved program;
(B) Will not produce future budgetary increases; and
(C) Conforms to legislatively approved salary policies.
(b) Proposed changes not meeting the requirements  of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be
presented to the legislative review agency.
(4) State agencies shall report on a [ biennial] quarterly basis to the legislative review agency.
Each report shall include the number of [ vacant] budgeted  positions that have remained vacant
for a continuous period of six months , including all job categories  and classifications, within the
state agency. The legislative review  agency shall order the reporting state agency to show cause
why the budgeted positions have not been filled and shall assess fully  the impact the vacancies have
on:
(a) The state agency’s delivery of services,  accounting for any seasonal fluctuation in the need
for those services;
(b) The state agency’s budget due to increased use of overtime;
(c) The state agency’s use of temporary employees; and
(d) Employee workload.
(Cap on state government employment based on state population)
SECTION 4.
 ORS 240.185 is amended to read:
240.185. (1) On and after January 1, [ 1984] 2018, the  number of persons employed by the state
[shall not exceed 1.5 ] may not exceed one  percent of the state’s population of the prior year.
(2) The population figure shall be that required by ORS 190.510 to 190.610.
(3) This section applies to all full-time equivalent budgeted positions.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 2
(4) This  section does not apply to the Governor, the Secretary of State, the State Treasurer, the
Supreme Court or the Legislative Assembly in the conduct of  duties vested in any of them by the
Oregon Constitution. However, this exception applies  only to the office of the Governor and not to
the executive branch of government.
(5) This section does not  apply to personnel who administer unemployment insurance benefits
programs of the Employment Department, to personnel who administer programs required to be  im-
plemented as a condition for  the continued certification of the Employment Division Law by the
United States Secretary of Labor  or to personnel who administer programs implemented by the
United States  Department of Labor under federal law if the state is required to enter into contracts
to provide such programs.
(6) In order to assess  the effect of subsection (1) of this section, the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services by December 31 of  each even-numbered year shall conduct a workload analysis
of each state agency, regardless of  whether the agency is exempt from the application of subsection
(1) of this section. The workload analysis of each agency shall be submitted to the  Legislative As-
sembly prior to its  convening in the subsequent odd-numbered year regular session and shall ac-
company the agency’s budget request before the Joint Ways and Means Committee.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 240.185 by  section 4 of this 2017 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2018.
OREGON STATE LOTTERY COMMISSION TRANSFER
RATE AND ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
SECTION 6.  ORS 173.420, as amended by section  39, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
173.420. (1) Pursuant to the policies and directions of the appointing authority,  the Legislative
Fiscal Officer shall:
(a) Ascertain facts and make recommendations  to the Legislative Assembly concerning the
Governor’s budget.
(b) Ascertain facts  concerning state expenditures and make estimates concerning state expend-
itures.
(c) Ascertain facts  and make recommendations concerning the fiscal implications of the organ-
ization and functions of the state and its agencies.
(d) Ascertain facts and make recommendations on such other matters  as may be provided for
by joint or concurrent resolution.
(e) Furnish such assistance in the performance of their duties as is requested by the House Re-
venue Committee,  the Senate Revenue Committee, the Legislative Revenue Officer and other legis-
lative standing and interim committees and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Pursuant to the policies and directions of the appointing authority, the Legislative  Fiscal
Officer may enter into contracts to carry out the functions of the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(3) The Legislative Fiscal Officer shall  cause a study to be conducted prior to the begin-
ning of  each odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly that reports the
preceding two calendar years’ administrative costs and the transfer rate of  the Oregon State
Lottery Commission, in order to determine if additional funds may  be made available for
public purposes.
PROCUREMENT PRACTICE IMPROVEMENTS
SECTION 7. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)  of this section, the Legislative Policy
and Research Director shall study procurement practices used by the state for the purpose
of determining whether:
(a) State procurement practices can be improved so  as to achieve increases in the cost
effectiveness of each procurement; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 3
(b) State contracting agencies within the executive department that are  exempt from the
procurement authority of the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services should remain
exempt.
(2) The director may not conduct the study described in subsection (1) of this  section if
the Secretary of  State, before the next regular session of the Legislative Assembly, an-
nounces a plan to audit the state’s procurement practices.
(3) The director shall describe the methods used to  conduct the study and present the
results of the study in a report to the Joint Legislative Audit Committee on  or before the
date on which the Legislative Assembly convenes in regular session in 2019.
UTILIZING COST INFORMATION IN
STATE BUDGET DEVELOPMENT
(Legislative Fiscal Officer review)
SECTION 8.  ORS 291.210, as amended by section  17, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
291.210. (1) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and the Legislative Fiscal Offi-
cer shall prepare a tentative budget for the next biennium for which  the Governor’s budget is pre-
pared. The tentative budget shall consist of the estimated revenues under ORS 291.342 for the  next
biennium and a preliminary estimate of the projected costs of continuing currently authorized pro-
grams for the next biennium.
(2) The Legislative Fiscal Officer shall, during  the development of the legislatively
adopted budget,  review and update projected costs of continuing currently authorized pro-
grams for the next biennium, including:
(a) Position vacancy assumptions;
(b) Standard and exceptional inflation adjustments;
(c) Mandated caseloads; and
(d) Other assumptions used in developing the tentative budget.
(Targets for deferred maintenance)
SECTION 9.
(1) Each  biennium, the Governor shall propose as part of the Governor’s
recommended budget an amount for deferred maintenance and  capital improvements on ex-
isting state-owned  buildings and infrastructure that is equivalent to at least two percent of
the current replacement value of the state-owned buildings and infrastructure.
(2) As used in this section, “state-owned buildings and infrastructure” does not include:
(a) Buildings and infrastructure owned by or  for the use of a public university listed in
ORS 352.002 or a community college as defined in ORS 341.005; or
(b) Transportation infrastructure, including roads and bridges.
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT
SYSTEM COST CONTAINMENT
(Employer side accounts)
SECTION 10.
 ORS 291.216, as amended by section 19, chapter  117, Oregon Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
291.216. (1) The Governor’s budget shall  include a budget message prepared by the Governor,
including recommendations of the  Governor with reference to the fiscal policy of the state govern-
ment for the coming  biennium, describing the important features of the budget, embracing a general
budget summary setting forth the aggregate figures of the budget  so as to show a balanced relation
between the total proposed expenditures and the  total anticipated income, with the basis and factors
on which the  estimates are made, the amount to be borrowed, and other means of financing the es-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 4
timated expenditures for the ensuing biennium, compared with the corresponding figures for at  least
the last completed biennium and the current biennium.
(2) The Governor’s budget  shall be supported by explanatory schedules or statements, classifying
the expenditures reported  in the budget, both past and proposed, by organization units, objects and
funds, and the income by organization units,  sources and funds, and the proposed amount of new
borrowing as well as proposed new tax or  revenue sources, including a single comprehensive list
of all proposed increases in fees, licenses and assessments assumed in the budget.
(3) The  Governor’s budget shall be submitted for all dedicated funds, as well as the state Gen-
eral Fund, and shall include the estimated amounts of federal and other aids or grants to state
agencies or activities  provided for any purpose whatever, together with estimated expenditures
therefrom.
(4) The Governor’s budget shall  embrace the detailed estimates of expenditures and revenues.
It shall include:
(a) Statements of the  bonded indebtedness of the state government, showing the actual amount
of the debt service for at least the past biennium, and the estimated amount  for the current
biennium and the ensuing  biennium, the debt authorized and unissued, the condition of the sinking
funds and the borrowing capacity.
(b) The Governor’s recommendations concerning tax expenditures identified under ORS 291.214.
(c) Any statements relative to the financial plan which the Governor may consider desirable  or
which may be required by the Legislative Assembly.
(5) The Governor’s  budget shall use the estimated revenues under ORS 291.342 for the fiscal
year in which the budget is submitted as the  basis for total anticipated income under subsection (1)
of this section, subject  to adjustment as may be necessary to reflect accurately projections for the
next biennium.
(6)(a) The Governor’s budget shall present  information regarding the expenses of the state in the
following categories:
(A) Personnel expenses, including  compensation and benefits for state employees, but excluding
costs of services contracted out and temporary service costs.
(B) Supplies, equipment and the costs of services contracted out.
(C) Special payments.
(D) Capital construction.
(E) Capital outlay.
(F) Debt service.
(b) For each category described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the budget shall show actual
expenditures for the prior biennium and estimated expenditures for the current biennium.
(c) As supplemental information to  the budget, the Governor shall include an estimate of the
projected  costs  of continuing currently authorized programs in the next biennium. The estimate shall
include, but is not limited to the projected costs of:
(A) Removing one-time expenditures;
(B) Program phase-ins and phase-outs;
(C) Personnel expenses compared  to existing compensation plan agreements, including position
vacancy experience calculations;
(D) Inflation for services, supplies and medical costs;
(E) Transfers between state funds or accounts;
(F) Mandated caseload changes; and
(G) Debt service for previously issued debt.
(d) The budget shall show the  total increase in the cost of salaries and benefits for all state
positions.
(7) The Governor’s budget shall include:
(a) The total number of positions and full-time equivalent positions included in the budget.
(b) The average vacancy rate in the present biennium.
(c) The number  of permanent, full-time equivalent vacancies as of July 1 of even-numbered years.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 5
(8) The Governor’s budget shall  include computations showing budget figures as a percentage
of the total General Fund, federal fund, fee or other source category, as may be appropriate.
(9) The Governor’s budget shall include, in a  format that provides side-by-side comparison with
the State Debt Policy Advisory Commission report of net debt capacity, a six-year  forecast, by debt
type and repayment source, of:
(a) That  portion of the capital construction program required to be reported by ORS 291.224 that
will be financed by debt issuance.
(b) The acquisition of equipment or technology in  excess of $500,000 that will be financed by
debt issuance.
(c) Other state agency debt issuance for grant or loan purposes.
(10) The Governor’s budget  shall include the outcomes-based budgeting information required by
ORS 291.217 (2) and (3).
(11) The Governor’s budget shall include recommendations regarding available funds that
could be used to make lump sum payments to the Public Employees Retirement  System un-
der ORS 238.229.
SECTION 10a.
 ORS 238.229 is amended to read:
238.229. (1) If a participating public  employer is grouped with any other public employer for the
purpose of computing employer contributions under ORS 238.225  and the individual public employer
makes a lump sum payment that is  in addition to the normal employer contribution of the public
employer, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall  adjust the amount of employer contributions
to be made by the individual public employer to  ensure that the benefit of the lump sum payment
accrues only to the individual public employer making the payment. An individual  public employer
that makes a lump sum payment  under the provisions of this subsection shall remain grouped with
other public employers as provided by  ORS 238.227 and 238A.220 for the purpose of all liabilities
of the employer that are not paid under this subsection. The board by  rule may establish a minimum
lump sum payment that must  be made by an individual public employer before adjusting employer
contributions  under  this subsection. Notwithstanding any minimum lump sum payment established
by the board, the board must allow an individual  public employer to make a lump sum payment
under this subsection if  the payment is equal to the full amount of the individual public employer’s
accrued unfunded liabilities under this section and ORS chapter 238A.
(2) The  board shall establish [ a] one or more  separate [ account] accounts  within the Public
Employees Retirement Fund  for [ each] one or more  lump sum [ payment] payments made under this
section by an individual public employer. The board shall  credit to each account all interest and
other income received  from investment of the account funds during the calendar year. Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, the board may not collect any administrative expense  or
other charge from the account or from  earnings on the account. Except as provided in subsections
(5) and (6) of this section,  the account shall be used to offset contributions to the system that the
public employer would otherwise be required  to make for the liabilities against which the lump sum
payment is applied.
(3) The board may charge a participating public employer expenses for administration of an ac-
count established under subsection (2) of this section in an  amount not to exceed $2,500 for the
calendar year in which the account is established and for the  immediately following two calendar
years, and in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per year for all subsequent years.
(4) If a participating public employer has any liabilities that are attributable to creditable ser-
vice by employees of the employer before the participating public employer  was grouped with other
public employers under ORS 238.227, whether  under this section or pursuant to board rule, any lump
sum payment made  under this section must be applied first against those liabilities, with the oldest
liability being paid first. Any amounts remaining after application  under this subsection must be
deposited in a separate account established under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, if the board determines  at any time after
an actuarial study that the amounts in  an account established under subsection (2) of this section
exceed the amounts necessary to fund the employer’s actuarial liabilities under the system, upon
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 6
request of the employer, the  board shall apply the excess amounts to offset contributions to the in-
dividual account  program that the employer has agreed to pay under ORS 238A.335 or 238A.340.
The board may apply excess amounts to offset contributions to the  individual account program un-
der this subsection only to the extent that the application will not result in  the balance in the ac-
count being reduced to less than the outstanding  principal balance owed on the bonds issued to fund
the account. If the request is made  by a school district, the school district must attach to the re-
quest a copy of a resolution adopted by the district school board for the  district authorizing the
request. The board shall adopt rules governing offsets under the provisions of this subsection.
(6) The board shall apply any excess amounts in an account established under subsection  (2) of
this section to offset contributions to the individual account program pursuant to subsection (5)  of
this section only  if the board has determined that applying the excess amounts does not cause the
system or the Public Employees Retirement  Fund to lose qualification as a qualified governmental
retirement plan and trust under the Internal  Revenue Code and under regulations adopted pursuant
to the Internal Revenue Code.
(Contingency reserve account)
SECTION 11.  ORS 238.670 is amended to read:
238.670. (1) At the close of each calendar year in which the earnings on the Public Employees
Retirement Fund equal or exceed the assumed  interest rate established by the Public Employees
Retirement Board under ORS 238.255, the board  shall set aside, out of interest and other income
received through investment of  the Public Employees Retirement Fund during that calendar year,
such part of the income as  the board may deem advisable, not exceeding seven and one-half percent
of the combined total of such income, which moneys so segregated shall  remain in the fund and
constitute therein a reserve  account. The board shall continue to credit the reserve account in the
manner required by this subsection until  the board determines that the reserve account is ade-
quately funded for the purposes specified in this subsection , but the board  may not credit further
amounts to the reserve account if the amounts in the reserve  account exceed $50 million .
Such reserve account shall be maintained and used by the  board to prevent any deficit of moneys
available for the payment of  retirement allowances, due to interest fluctuations, changes in mortal-
ity rate or, except as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, other  contingency. In addition,
the reserve account may be used by the board for the following purposes:
(a) To prevent any deficit in the fund by  reason of the insolvency of a participating public em-
ployer. Reserves under this paragraph may  be funded only from the earnings on employer contrib-
utions made under ORS 238.225.
(b) To  pay any legal expenses or judgments that do not arise in the ordinary course of adjudi-
cating an individual member’s benefits or an individual employer’s liabilities.
[(c) To provide for any other contingency that the board may determine to be appropriate. ]
(2) At  the close of each calendar year, the board shall set aside, out of interest and other income
received during the calendar year, after  deducting the amounts provided by law and to the extent
that such income is available, a sufficient amount to credit to the reserves for pension  accounts and
annuities varying percentage amounts adopted by  the board as a result of periodic actuarial inves-
tigations. If total income available for distribution exceeds those  percentages of the total accumu-
lated contributions of employees and employers,  the reserves for pensions and annuities shall
participate in such excess.
(3) The board may set aside, out of interest and other income received through investment of
the fund, such part of  the income as the board considers necessary, which moneys so segregated
shall remain in the fund and constitute one or more reserve accounts. Such reserve  accounts shall
be maintained and used by the board to offset gains and losses of invested capital. The board, from
time to time, may cause to be transferred from the reserve account provided for  in subsection (1)
of this section to a reserve account provided for in this subsection such amount as the board de-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 7
termines to  be unnecessary for the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section and to be
necessary for the purposes set forth in this subsection.
(4) The  board may provide for amortizing gains and losses of invested capital in such instances
as the board determines that amortization is preferable to a  reserve account provided for in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(5) At least 30 days  before crediting any interest and other income received through investment
of the Public Employees Retirement Fund to any reserve account in the  fund, the board shall submit
a preliminary proposal for crediting to the appropriate  legislative review agency, as defined in ORS
291.371 (1), for its review and comment.
(Determination of unfunded accrued liability)
SECTION 12.  ORS 238.605 is amended to read:
238.605. (1) At least  once every two years the Public Employees Retirement Board shall cause
a competent actuary familiar with public systems of retirement and death  benefits to prepare a re-
port evaluating the current and prospective assets and liabilities  of the system and indicating its
current and prospective financial condition.  In preparing the report the actuary shall investigate the
mortality, disability, service and  other experience of the members of, and employers participating in
the system, shall state fully the condition  of the system, and shall make such recommendations as
the actuary deems advisable to facilitate administering  it properly. The board shall publish and
distribute a summary of  the report to all the public employers participating in the system. The board
may authorize the transfer of any portion of the funds collected under  the provisions of ORS 238.225
to carry out the recommendations of the actuary.
(2) For the purpose of evaluating the system under this section and for the purpose of
issuing reports on the system, the actuary and the board shall determine the  unfunded
actuarial liability of the system by calculating the difference between the actuarial  value of
the current and prospective liabilities of the system and the actuarial value  of the assets of
the system, including any lump sum payments made under ORS  238.229. When reporting on
the unfunded actuarial liability in any official documentation or report, the board shall  re-
port on the unfunded actuarial liability as determined under this subsection.
STATE BORROWING
SECTION 13. Section 14 of this 2017  Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter
286A.
SECTION 14. (1) The State of Oregon  recognizes that adherence to a debt management
policy that provides guidelines for debt issuance  is necessary to limit the long-term impact
of debt on the budget of the state, to  preserve the credit rating of the state and to maintain
available debt capacity to meet the continuing  capital investment needs of this state. Ac-
cordingly, it is the policy of the State of Oregon that, in determining the  total amount of
bonds to be authorized each biennium, the Legislative Assembly shall:
(a) Limit the issuance of bonds to projects or  programs that require a minimum amount
of state funding, as determined by the Legislative Assembly each biennium, and direct  that
projects or programs  with funding needs that are under the minimum amount be funded with
current resources; and
(b) Prohibit the issuance of bonds for ongoing operating expenditures of the state.
(2) This section does not require the Legislative Assembly to prohibit:
(a) Borrowing for ongoing operating expenditures  of the state as authorized under ORS
286A.045;
(b) Borrowing to finance pension obligations under ORS 238.692 to 238.698;
(c) Borrowing to finance activities related to environmental remediation;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 8
(d) The use of bond  proceeds to pay for administration or management of projects or
programs funded by the bond proceeds; or
(e) The use of interest or investment  earnings on bond proceeds for ongoing operating
expenditures.
DEBT COLLECTION PRACTICES
SECTION 15.  ORS 293.231 is amended to read:
293.231. (1) Except as provided  in subsections [ (4) to (9) ] (4) to (7)  of this section, a state agency,
unless otherwise prohibited by law, shall offer for assignment  every liquidated and delinquent ac-
count to [ a private collection agency or to ] the Department of Revenue as provided in ORS 293.250
not later than:
(a) Ninety days from the  date the account was liquidated if no payment has been received on
the account within the 90-day period; or
(b) Ninety days from the date of receipt of the most recent payment on the account.
(2) Nothing in subsection  (1) of this section prohibits a state agency from offering for assignment
a liquidated and delinquent account to [ a private collection agency ] the Department of Revenue
at any time within the 90-day period.
[(3) If, after a reasonable time, the private collection agency is unable to collect the  account, the
private collection agency  shall notify the state agency that assigned the account that it has been unable
to collect the account and shall relinquish  the account to the state agency. A private collection agency
that collects an account  under this section shall be held to the same standard of confidentiality, service
and courtesy imposed on the state agency that assigned the account. ]
[(4)] (3)(a) If a state agency assigns a liquidated and delinquent account  to the Department of
Revenue as provided in ORS 293.250, the department [ shall have ] has six months from the date of
assignment to collect a payment. If the department does not collect a  payment within that six-month
period or if six months have elapsed since the date of receipt of the most recent payment on  the
account, the department shall [ notify the state agency. The state agency shall then ] immediately  offer
for assignment the debt to a private collection agency[ .] and notify the state  agency of the as-
signment.
(b) Nothing in this subsection  prohibits the department from offering for assignment the
debt to a private collection agency at any time within the six-month period.
[(5)] (4) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to a  liquidated and delin-
quent account that is prohibited by state or federal law or regulation from assignment  or collection.
[(6)] (5) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may adopt rules  exempting specified
kinds of liquidated  and delinquent accounts from the time periods established in subsections (1), (2)
and [ (4)] (3) of this section.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, liquidated and delinquent accounts
that originate in the Department of Revenue shall be offered for assignment by the  depart-
ment to a private collection agency not later than one year from the date of  the most recent
payment on the account.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the Department of  Revenue from offering for
assignment a liquidated and delinquent account that originates in the department to  a pri-
vate collection agency at any time within the one-year period.
[(7)] (c) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  adopt rules exempting liqui-
dated and delinquent accounts that  originate in the [ Department of Revenue or the ] Employment
Department from the time periods established in subsections (1), (2) and [ (4)] (3) of this section.
[(8) A liquidated and delinquent account that is subject to assignment under this section shall be
assigned to a private  collection agency if more than one year has elapsed without a payment on the
account.]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 9
[(9)] (7) Notwithstanding [ subsection (1) ] subsections (1) and (6)  of this section, a state agency
or the Department of Revenue  may,  at its discretion, choose not to offer for assignment to  the
Department of Revenue or  a private collection agency a liquidated and delinquent account that:
(a) Is secured by a consensual security interest in real or personal property;
(b) Is a court-ordered judgment that includes restitution or a payment to the  Department of
Justice Crime Victims’ Assistance Section;
(c) Is in litigation, including bankruptcy, arbitration and mediation;
(d) Is a student loan owed by a student who is attending school;
(e) Is owed to a state agency by a local or state government or by the federal government;
(f) Is owed by a debtor who is hospitalized in  a state hospital as defined in ORS 162.135, who
receives public assistance as defined in ORS 411.010 or  who receives medical assistance as defined
in ORS 414.025;
(g) Is owed by a debtor who is imprisoned;
(h) Is less than $100, including penalties;
(i) Would result in loss of federal funding if assigned;
(j) Is owed by an estate and the state agency has notice that the estate has closed; or
(k) Is eligible for suspension of collection as provided in ORS 305.155.
[(10)] (8) Nothing in this section  prohibits a state agency from collecting a [ tax offset ] setoff
against any refunds or sums due to the debtor from the state agency  after a liquidated  and
delinquent account is assigned to a private collection agency.
[(11)] (9) For the purposes  of this section, [ a state agency shall be deemed ] the Department of
Revenue is considered to  have offered for assignment to a private collection agency  an account
if:
(a) The terms of the offer are of a type generally acceptable within the collections industry  for
the type of account offered for assignment; and
(b) The offer is made to a private collection agency that engages  in collecting on accounts of
the type sought  to be assigned or is made generally available to private collection agencies through
a bid or request for proposal process.
[(12)(a)] (10)(a) A state agency that  assigns a liquidated and delinquent account to the Depart-
ment of Revenue [ under ORS  293.250] may add a fee to be paid by the debtor to the amount of the
liquidated and delinquent account. The fee  may include amounts attributable to collections
conducted by private collection agencies as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) A fee may not be added under this subsection  unless the state agency has provided notice
to the debtor:
(A) Of the existence of the debt;
(B) That the debt may be assigned to the Department of Revenue for collection; and
(C) Of the amount of the fee that may be added to the debt under this subsection.
[(13)] (11) [ A state agency that retains a  private collection agency under this section ] For any
liquidated and delinquent account that the Department of Revenue assigns to a private  col-
lection agency under subsection (6) of this  section, the department  may add a fee to the
amount of  the liquidated and delinquent account as provided in ORS 697.105. A fee may not be added
under this subsection unless the [ state agency ] department has provided notice to the debtor:
(a) Of the existence of the debt;
(b) That the debt may be assigned to a private collection agency for collection; and
(c) Of the amount of the fee that may be added to the debt under this subsection.
[(14)] (12) Except as provided by federal law, [ the] a state agency or the Department of Re-
venue may not add a  fee under subsection [ (13)] (10) or (11)  of this section that exceeds the col-
lection fee of the private collection agency  or the department .
(13)(a) A private collection agency that collects an account under this section shall  be
held to  the same standard of confidentiality, service and courtesy imposed on the Depart-
ment of Revenue.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 10
(b) The department shall set forth in writing the standards described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection and shall transmit the writing to a private collection  agency before as-
signing an account to the agency under this section.
(14)(a) A state agency may recall an account  assigned to the Department of Revenue if
the account is deemed uncollectible under ORS 293.240 or settled by compromise  under ORS
293.240, or if the account may  not be collected under state or federal law or is eligible for
cancellation under state or federal law.
(b) If an  account recalled under this subsection was assigned to a private collection
agency, the department shall cancel and recall the  account from the private collection
agency.
SECTION 16.  ORS 293.250 is amended to read:
293.250. (1) There is created a Collections Unit in the Department of Revenue.
(2) The Department of Revenue may render assistance  in the collection of any delinquent ac-
count owing to any state agency, or to a county pursuant  to a judgment obtained under ORS
169.151, assigned by the state agency or county to which the delinquent account is owed to the  de-
partment for collection. The  department may prescribe criteria for the kinds of accounts that may
be assigned under this section, including a minimum dollar amount owed.
(3)(a) Subject to rules prescribed by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services for col-
lection of delinquent accounts owing to state agencies or to counties, the  Department of Revenue
shall render assistance in the collection and shall  charge the state agencies or counties separately
for the cost of assistance. The charges may not exceed the proceeds of collection credited to the
state agency or county for the  same biennium. The Department of Revenue may designate a single
percentage to retain from the proceeds of collection as a charge for the cost of assistance.  If the
Department of  Revenue finds that accounts assigned to the department for collection by certain
state agencies or counties  lack sufficient information to properly and efficiently identify the debtor
or that the account information must  be put into a form usable by the department in order to effi-
ciently provide collection  services, the department may establish a separate percentage charge to
be retained from collections for the state agency or  county. The charge must reflect the average
of the actual cost to provide collection services for all accounts assigned by  that state agency or
county.
(b) In providing  assistance, the Department of Revenue shall make all reasonable efforts to
collect the delinquent accounts including the setoff of any refunds or sums due to the debtor from
the department or any other state agency. The department may  offset any refunds or sums due to
the debtor from the department or any other state  agency against delinquent accounts assigned by
a county to the department for collection under this section.
(c) No setoff may be made by  the Department of Revenue unless the debt is in a liquidated
amount.
[(d) When the Department of Revenue has notified the assigning state  agency or county that a re-
fund or other sum due to the debtor is available for setoff, the debtor may arrange with  the department
or county for payment of the  debt in full before the setoff is made. However, the assigning state agency
or county may not enter into any agreement with the debtor for  payment of the debt before the setoff
is made.]
[(e) At the time any setoff is made, the debtor shall  be notified by the Department of Revenue of
its intention to apply sums due from a  state agency against the debtor’s delinquent account. The notice
shall provide  that the debtor within 30 days may request a hearing before the claimant state agency
or county. No issues at the hearing may be considered that have  been litigated previously, or if the
debtor after being given due notice of rights of appeal has failed to exercise them timely. ]
(d) At the time any setoff is made, the Department  of Revenue shall notify the debtor
of the sums due to the debtor from a state agency  that are applied against the debtor’s de-
linquent account. The notice must provide  that the debtor may, within 30 days and in a
manner prescribed by the department, contest  the setoff and request a hearing before the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 11
department. No issues may be considered at the  hearing that were previously litigated or
that the debtor failed to raise timely after being given due notice of rights of appeal.
[(f)] (e) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue in payment of  charges made under
paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be paid into the State  Treasury and deposited in a miscella-
neous receipts account for the department.
[(g)] (f) Net proceeds of collections of  delinquent accounts shall be credited to the account or
fund of the state agency or county to which the debt was originally owing.
(4)(a) In providing assistance in the collection of any  delinquent account under this section, the
Department of Revenue may issue a warrant for  the collection of the delinquent account. The
warrant may be recorded in the County Clerk Lien Record maintained under ORS 205.130.
(b) A warrant may not be issued under this subsection unless the debt  is in a liquidated amount.
(c) The amount of any warrant issued  under this subsection shall include the [ principal] amount
of the debt, any added penalties or interest attributable to the delinquent account  and any costs
associated with recording,  indexing or service of the warrant and any satisfaction or release thereof.
(d) A warrant may not be issued under this subsection before the debtor has  been notified that
the department intends to issue the  warrant and of the collection action that may be taken under
the warrant.
(5) Except as prohibited by federal law and notwithstanding any provision  of state law,
for purposes of collecting debts  assigned to the Department of Revenue under ORS 293.231,
the Collections Unit created  under subsection (1) of this section has access to all data and
other information available to the department for any purpose allowed by law.
[(5)] (6) Nothing in this section prohibits the collection of:
(a) A child or spousal support obligation as provided in ORS 25.610; or
(b) Criminal judgments that impose monetary obligations, including  judgments requiring the
payment of fines, costs, assessments, compensatory fines, attorney fees, forfeitures or restitution.
[(6)] (7)  As used in this section, “state  agency” means any state officer, board, commission,
corporation, institution, department or other state organization.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 293.226 is amended to read:
293.226. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a state agency [ that requests a person to ]
may request that a person  voluntarily supply the person’s Social  Security number for use in
collecting debts owed to the State of Oregon  on any document relating to any  monetary obli-
gation or transaction . A state agency that so requests shall  [ may] include on the  document a
notice disclosing that the Social Security  number is requested for and  may be used for state
agency debt collection activities.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall adopt rules:
(a) Specifying the form of the  notice, including provisions specifying when the notice must state
[that] whether the disclosure of a Social Security number is voluntary  or mandatory ; and
(b) Setting procedures for the sharing of Social Security  numbers between state agencies , and
between the Department of Revenue  and private collection agencies , for the purpose of collecting
debts owed state agencies.
(3) If a person is required  to provide the person’s Social Security number to [ the requesting ] a
state agency under federal or state law  for purposes other than collection of a debt owed  to the
State of Oregon , [ this section does not  apply. ] the agency may not use the Social Security
number for debt collection purposes, except:
(a) When the agency requests that the person voluntarily disclose the  person’s Social
Security number for the purpose of  collecting debts owed to the State of Oregon, the agency
provides the notice required under subsection (1) of this section and the  person subsequently
voluntarily provides the person’s Social Security number; or
(b) When otherwise allowed under state or federal law.
(4) A state agency, the Department of Revenue  [ under ORS 293.250 ] or a private collection
agency [ assigned] that is collecting  a  liquidated and delinquent account [ under ORS 1.197 or
293.231] may use a Social Security number collected under this section, or  collected as otherwise
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 12
allowed by law, to collect any debt owed a  state agency or local government by the person associ-
ated with the Social Security number.
(5) Nothing in this section authorizes a  state agency, the Department of Revenue or a private
collection agency [ assigned an ] that is collecting a liquidated  and delinquent account [ under ORS
1.197, 293.231 or 293.250 ] to use or disclose a  Social Security number for any reason other than a
reason specified in this section.
(6) Rules adopted under subsection (2) of this section do not  apply to state courts and commis-
sions, departments  and divisions in the judicial branch of state government, the Secretary of State
or the State Treasurer.
(7) Except as  provided in subsection (6) of this section, as used in this section, “state agency”
means any state officer, board, commission, corporation, institution, department or  other state or-
ganization.
SECTION 18.  ORS 293.229 is amended to read:
293.229. (1) Not later than October 1 of each fiscal year,  each state agency shall submit a report
to the Legislative Fiscal Office that describes  the status of that agency’s liquidated and delinquent
accounts  and  efforts made by that agency to collect liquidated and delinquent accounts during the
previous fiscal year. The report required under this subsection shall be in a form prescribed by  the
Legislative Fiscal Office and shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Beginning balance and total number of all liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(b) New liquidated and delinquent accounts added during the last preceding fiscal year;
(c) Total collections of liquidated and delinquent accounts;
(d) Total amount and total number of liquidated and delinquent accounts that have been  written
off;
(e) Total number and ending balance of all liquidated and delinquent accounts;
[(f) Total amount of  liquidated and delinquent accounts turned over to private collection agencies
and total amount collected by those agencies under ORS 293.231; ]
(f) Total  amount of liquidated and delinquent accounts assigned to the Department of
Revenue and the total amount collected by the department under ORS 293.250;
(g) Total amount of liquidated and delinquent accounts  assigned to private collection
agencies and the total amount collected by private collection agencies under ORS 293.231;
[(g)] (h) Total number and total amount of all liquidated and  delinquent accounts exempted un-
der ORS 293.233;
[(h)] (i) Total number and ending balance  of all liquidated and delinquent accounts that have
been placed in suspended collection status under ORS 305.155; and
[(i)] (j) A statement indicating whether the agency  has liquidated and delinquent accounts that
are not exempt under ORS  293.233, or are otherwise prohibited or exempted by law from assignment,
for which no payment  has been received for more than 90 days and that have not been assigned to
[a private collection agency or to ] the Department of Revenue under ORS 293.231.
(2) If a state agency reports under subsection (1) of this section that the total ending
balance of its  liquidated and delinquent accounts is $50 million or greater, the state agency
shall, not later than three months after it submits  the report under subsection (1) of this
section, submit an additional report to the committees or interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to ways and means that:
(a) Describes major categories of liquidated and  delinquent accounts held by the state
agency;
(b) Describes circumstances under which the  state agency writes off or adjusts liquidated
and delinquent amounts or removes an account from liquidated and delinquent status;
(c) Describes actions undertaken by the state agency to reduce the amount of  liquidated
and delinquent debt owed to it at the end of each fiscal year; and
(d) Sets forth a plan for future actions that will reduce the amount  of liquidated and
delinquent debt owed to the state  agency at the end of each fiscal year and describes any
additional resources that are necessary to carry out the plan.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 13
[(2)] (3) The Legislative Fiscal Office shall produce  an annual report not later than December
31 of each fiscal year on the status of liquidated and delinquent accounts of state agencies and the
judicial branch of state government.  The report shall be based on the reports submitted by state
agencies as required in this section and on reports submitted by the judicial branch of state gov-
ernment under ORS 1.195.
[(3)] (4) The report required under subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section shall:
(a) List those state agencies, including the judicial branch of state government, that have  liq-
uidated and delinquent accounts that are not exempt under ORS 1.198, 1.199 or 293.233, or are  oth-
erwise prohibited or exempted by law from assignment,  for which no payment has been received for
more than 90 days and that have not been assigned to a private collection  agency or to the De-
partment of Revenue under ORS 1.197 or assigned to the  Department of Revenue under  293.231;
(b) List  separately information about the liquidated and delinquent accounts of the Secretary
of State, the State Treasurer, other state agencies in the executive branch of  state government and
the judicial branch of state government; and
(c) Include any other information the Legislative Fiscal Office determines is necessary  to de-
scribe the status of liquidated and delinquent accounts across offices and branches of  state govern-
ment.
[(4)] (5) Notwithstanding ORS 182.460, 284.118, 284.375, 352.138, 353.100, 377.836,  421.352, 656.753
and 757.552, for purposes of this section, “state agency” also includes  semi-independent state agen-
cies listed in ORS 182.454, the Oregon Tourism Commission, the Oregon Film and Video Office,  the
Travel Information Council, the Children’s  Trust Fund of Oregon Foundation, Oregon Corrections
Enterprises, Oregon Health and Science University, the State  Accident Insurance Fund Corporation,
the Oregon Utility Notification Center and public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 293.233 is amended to read:
293.233. (1) A state agency may use rules adopted by the Oregon Department of  Administrative
Services for exempting liquidated and delinquent accounts from assignment to the Department  of
Revenue or a private collection agency. The state agency  shall provide documentation and justi-
fication for exempting liquidated and delinquent accounts from assignment.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall adopt  rules governing the proce-
dure that a state agency may follow in exempting a liquidated  and delinquent account from assign-
ment, including but not limited to adequacy of the documentation and justification  that a state
agency is required to provide under this section.
SECTION 20.  ORS 293.240 is amended to read:
293.240. (1)  If a state agency has made all reasonable efforts to collect money owed to [ it, in-
cluding money owed on a liquidated and delinquent account that has been relinquished by  a private
collection agency under ORS 293.231, ] the  agency  and has determined that the money and any in-
terest or penalties on the money are uncollectible, the  agency may write off the debt on its ac-
counts.
(2) Before determining that money is uncollectible under subsection  (1) of this section, a state
agency must adopt criteria for determining when money is uncollectible. The criteria must  include
the right of offset and must be approved by the Attorney General.
(3)(a) A state agency, the Department of Revenue collecting on an account under  ORS 293.250
or a private collection agency collecting on  an account under ORS 293.231[ ,] may propose and ac-
cept offers of compromise for settlement  of a debt owed to a state agency. Before proposing or ac-
cepting an offer of compromise, a state agency must adopt criteria  for determining when offers of
compromise may be made. The criteria must be approved by:
(A) The Attorney General in the case of the Secretary of State and State Treasurer;
(B) The Chief Justice in the case of all state courts and all commissions,  departments and divi-
sions in the judicial branch of state government; or
(C) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  and the Attorney General in the case
of other state agencies.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 14
(b) A private  collection agency or the Department of Revenue shall accept an offer of compro-
mise for settlement of a debt owed to a state agency:
(A) In accordance with the criteria adopted by the state agency to which  the debt is owed; and
(B) With the authorization of the state agency to which the debt is owed.
(c) This subsection does not allow the compromise of a criminal money judgment  that requires
a defendant to pay restitution or a compensatory fine.
(4) This section does not apply to debts owed to a state agency for which a procedure for  com-
promise, release, discharge, waiver, cancellation or other form of settlement for the  debt for reasons
other than uncollectibility is by law made specially applicable to the state agency.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 293.252 is amended to read:
293.252. (1) The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services shall monitor state agency debt
collection functions described by law and assist state agencies in efforts  to improve the collection
of delinquent debts owed to state agencies.  The department’s duties under this subsection include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Providing training to state agencies regarding processing and managing  accounts receivable
in compliance with applicable law and state policies.
(b) Providing  technical assistance to state agencies in resolving challenges in processing and
managing accounts receivable and  developing financial administrative systems to improve the han-
dling of liquidated and delinquent accounts.
(c) Developing performance standards for state debt collection, including  but not limited to
standards defining what constitutes liquidated and delinquent  accounts and when [ state agencies may
write off ] debt may be written off  pursuant to ORS 293.240.
(d) Working with state agencies to improve the quality and value of data that  each state agency
submits to the Legislative Fiscal Office for purposes of ORS 293.229.
(e) Submitting an annual management report to the Legislative Assembly not later than De-
cember 31 of each fiscal  year, in conjunction with the report of the Legislative Fiscal Office
produced under ORS 293.229, that  identifies important issues and significant trends in state agency
debt collection practices and describes and evaluates  efforts by state agencies to improve the col-
lection of delinquent debt.
(2) The department shall adopt policies:
(a) Providing guidance for the collection of liquidated and delinquent accounts owing to state
agencies.
(b) Setting procedures for state agencies to account for and manage information  regarding the
agency’s liquidated and delinquent accounts.
(c) After consultation  with the Attorney General, setting criteria for effective and efficient as-
signment of liquidated and delinquent accounts to the Department  of Revenue or private collection
agencies, and setting performance measurements to be used in the application of the criteria.
(d) For the allocation, form and amount of charges or fees added  to liquidated and delinquent
accounts under ORS 293.231, 293.250 and 697.105.
(e) Setting exemptions or adjustments for state agencies that are  prohibited by law from adding
or collecting fees under ORS 293.231, 293.250 or 697.105 and for agencies  for which the addition or
collection of the fees is not feasible given the agency resources available for collection of  accounts
receivable.
(f) For the improvement of  communications regarding liquidated and delinquent accounts [ be-
tween] among state agencies[ ,] and between private collection agencies and the Department of
Revenue.
(g) Describing conditions under which a state agency may request and collect Social Security
numbers in accordance with state and federal law when it is reasonably foreseeable  that a person
may owe the state agency a liquidated and delinquent amount as a result of a transaction or activ-
ity.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 15
(h) After  consultation with the Attorney General, setting criteria under which state agencies ,
the Department of Revenue  and  private collection agencies may propose and accept offers of
compromise as provided in ORS 293.240.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “State agency” means any state  officer, board, commission, corporation, institution, depart-
ment or other state organization.
(b) “State agency” does not include all  state courts and all commissions, departments and divi-
sions in the judicial branch of state government, the Secretary of State and the State Treasurer.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 137.118 is amended to read:
137.118. (1) Judgments in criminal actions that impose monetary obligations, including judgments
requiring the payment of fines, costs, assessments, compensatory fines, attorney fees,  forfeitures or
restitution, may be assigned by the state, by a municipal court or by a justice court for collection.
(2)(a) The state may assign a judgment to the  Department of Revenue or a private collection
agency.
(b) A justice court may assign  a judgment to a private collection agency or, in a criminal action,
to the Department of Revenue for the purposes described in ORS 156.315.
(c) A municipal court may assign a judgment to:
(A) A private collection agency; or
(B) The Department of Revenue for the purposes described in subsections (6) to  (8) of this sec-
tion, if the  judgment was entered in a criminal action and part of the judgment is payable to the
State of Oregon.
(d) Nothing in this subsection limits the right of a municipal  court or a justice court to assign
for collection judgments in matters other than criminal actions.
(3) A municipal or justice court may add to any judgment in a criminal action that  includes a
monetary obligation a fee for the cost  of collection if the court gives the defendant a period of time
to pay the obligation after the date of imposition of the sentence or  after the date of the hearing
or proceeding that results in the imposition of the financial obligation. The fee may not exceed 25
percent of the  monetary obligation imposed by the court without the addition of the cost of col-
lection and may not be more than  $250. The fee shall be waived or suspended by the court if the
defendant pays the monetary obligation in the manner required by the court.
(4) A state court shall add to any judgment  in a criminal action that includes a monetary obli-
gation the fees required by ORS 1.202.
(5) As used in subsections (1) to (5) of this section, “criminal  action” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 131.005.
(6) If part of  a judgment in a criminal action, as described in subsections (1) to (5) of this sec-
tion, is  payable to the State of Oregon, a municipal court may assign the judgment to the Collections
Unit in the Department of Revenue for the following purposes:
(a) To determine whether refunds or other sums are owed to the  debtor by the department; and
(b) To deduct the amount of debt from any refunds or  other sums owed to the debtor by the
department.
(7) If the Collections Unit determines that refunds or other sums are owed to the  debtor, the
department shall deduct the amount of the debt from any refunds or other  sums owed to the debtor
by the department. After also deducting costs  of its actions under subsections (6) to (8) of this sec-
tion, the department shall remit the amount  deducted from refunds or other sums owed to the debtor
to the municipal court that assigned the judgment.
(8) A debtor whose account is assigned to the Department of  Revenue for setoff under sub-
sections (6) to (8) of this  section is entitled to the notice required by ORS 293.250  (3)(d) [ (3)(e) and
to the opportunity for payment in ORS 293.250 (3)(d) ].
SECTION 23.
 ORS 156.315 is amended to read:
156.315. (1) A justice court  may assign a judgment in a criminal action, as described in ORS
137.118 (1) to (5), to the Collections Unit in the Department of Revenue for the following purposes:
(a) To determine whether refunds or other sums are owed to the  debtor by the department; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 16
(b) To deduct the amount of the  debt from any refunds or other sums owed to the debtor by the
department.
(2) If the  Collections Unit determines that refunds or other sums are owed to the debtor, the
department shall deduct the amount of the debt from any refunds or other  sums owed to the debtor
by the department. After also deducting  costs of its actions under this section, the department shall
remit the amount deducted from refunds or other sums owed to the debtor to the justice  court that
assigned the judgment.
(3) A debtor whose account is assigned to the Department of Revenue for setoff under this  sec-
tion is entitled to the notice required by ORS 293.250  (3)(d) [(3)(e) and to the opportunity for payment
in ORS 293.250 (3)(d) ].
SECTION 24. (1) The  amendments to ORS 137.118, 156.315, 293.226, 293.229, 293.231,
293.233, 293.240, 293.250 and 293.252 by sections 15 to 23 of this 2017 Act become operative July
1, 2018.
(2) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, the Department of Revenue or
any other state  agency may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this  section that is necessary for the department or state agency to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  all the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the department or state agency by the amendments to  ORS 137.118,
156.315, 293.226, 293.229, 293.231, 293.233, 293.240, 293.250 and 293.252 by sections 15 to 23 of this
2017 Act.
EMPLOYEE BENEFIT COST CONTAINMENT
(Public Employees’ Benefit Board and Oregon
Educators Benefit Board merger)
SECTION 25.
(1) In order to promote efficiency and avoid duplication of  effort, the Public
Employees’ Benefit  Board and the Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall develop a plan for
merger as described in this section.
(2) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board and the  Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall
each appoint an equal number of voting members from the Public Employees’  Benefit Board
and voting members from the Oregon Educators Benefit Board to  a combined executive
committee.
(3) The executive committee shall select one of its members as chair of  the committee.
The committee shall meet at such times as  determined by the chair or a majority of the
committee. A majority of the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of busi-
ness of the committee.
(4) The executive committee shall develop a plan for the orderly merger  of the functions
and operations of the Public Employees’ Benefit  Board and the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board. The executive committee shall present the plan developed under this subsection, as
well as a cost-benefit  analysis of the plan, to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means no
later than February 1, 2018.
SECTION 26.
(1) The executive director of the Public Employees’  Benefit Board shall also
serve as the executive director of the Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(2) The  executive director shall combine administrative functions and operations of the
Public Employees’  Benefit Board and the Oregon Educators Benefit Board to the greatest
extent practicable to avoid duplication of effort and to promote  efficiency, to the extent the
combination of functions and operations is consistent with  applicable law and administrative
rule.
(3) At least once each year, the executive  director shall report to the interim committees
of the Legislative  Assembly related to health on the status of the merger of the functions
and operations of the boards and actions  taken by the executive director to carry out the
plan developed under section 25 of this 2017 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 17
(Annual growth rate limit for health benefits)
SECTION 27.  ORS 243.135, as amended by section  4, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
243.135. (1) Notwithstanding any other benefit plan contracted for and offered by the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board, the  board shall contract for a health benefit plan or plans best designed
to meet the needs and provide  for the welfare of eligible employees, the state and the local gov-
ernments. In considering whether to enter into a contract for a plan, the board shall  place emphasis
on:
(a) Employee choice among high quality plans;
(b) A competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
(d) Employer flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) The improvement of employee health; and
(i) Health outcome and quality measures, described in ORS 413.017  (4), that are reported by the
plan.
(2) The board may  approve more than one carrier for each type of plan contracted for and of-
fered but the number of carriers shall be held to  a number consistent with adequate service to eli-
gible employees and their family members.
(3) Where appropriate for a contracted and offered health benefit  plan, the board shall provide
options under which an eligible employee  may arrange coverage for family members who are not
enrolled in another health benefit plan offered by the board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board. An eligible employee who declines coverage  in a health benefit plan offered by the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the  Oregon Educators Board and who is enrolled as a
spouse or family member in another health benefit plan  offered by the Public Employees’
Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit Board may not be paid the employer con-
tribution for the plan that was declined .
(4) Payroll deductions for costs that are not payable by the  state or a local government may be
made upon receipt of a signed authorization from  the employee indicating an election to participate
in the plan or plans selected and the deduction of a certain sum from the employee’s pay.
(5) In developing any health benefit plan, the board may provide  an option of additional cover-
age for eligible employees and their family members at an additional cost or premium.
(6) Transfer of enrollment from one plan to another shall be  open to all eligible employees and
their family members under rules adopted  by the board. Because of the special problems that may
arise in individual  instances under comprehensive group practice plan coverage involving acceptable
provider-patient relations between a particular panel of providers and  particular eligible employees
and their family members, the board shall provide a procedure  under which any eligible employee
may apply at any time to substitute a health  service benefit plan for participation in a comprehen-
sive group practice benefit plan.
(7) The board shall evaluate a benefit plan that serves a limited geographic region of  this state
according to the criteria described in subsection (1) of this section.
(8)(a) The board shall  use payment methodologies in self-insured health benefit plans of-
fered by  the board that are designed to limit the growth in per-member expenditures for
health services to no more than 3.4 percent per year.
(b) The  board shall adopt policies and practices designed to limit the annual increase in
premium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans to 3.4 percent.
(9) A carrier or third party administrator that contracts with the board to provide  or
administer a health benefit plan shall, at least once  each plan year, conduct an audit of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 18
health benefit plan enrollees’ continued eligibility for coverage  as spouses or dependents or
any other basis that would affect the cost of the premium for the plan.
SECTION 28.  ORS 243.866, as amended by section  5, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
243.866. (1) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall contract for benefit plans best designed
to meet the needs and provide for the welfare of  eligible employees, the districts and local govern-
ments. In considering whether to enter into a contract for a benefit plan, the board shall place em-
phasis on:
(a) Employee choice among high-quality plans;
(b) Encouragement of a competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
(d) District and local government flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) Improvement of employee health; and
(i) Health outcome and quality measures, described in ORS 413.017  (4), that are reported by the
plan.
(2) The board may approve more than one carrier for each type of benefit plan  offered, but the
board shall limit the number of carriers to  a number consistent with adequate service to eligible
employees and family members who are not enrolled in another health benefit  plan offered by
the board or the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.  An eligible employee who declines cover-
age in a health benefit plan offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board  or the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board and who is enrolled as a spouse or family member in another
health benefit plan offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or  the Public Employees’
Benefit Board may not be paid the employer contribution for the plan that was declined .
(3) When appropriate, the board shall provide options under which  an eligible employee may
arrange coverage for family members under a benefit plan.
(4) A district or  a local government shall provide that payroll deductions for benefit plan costs
that are not payable by the district or local government may  be made upon receipt of a signed au-
thorization from the  employee indicating an election to participate in the benefit plan or plans se-
lected and allowing the deduction of those costs from the employee’s pay.
(5) In developing any benefit plan, the board may provide an option of  additional coverage for
eligible employees and family members at an additional premium.
(6) The board shall adopt rules providing that transfer of enrollment from one benefit plan  to
another is open to all eligible employees and family members. Because of the  special problems that
may arise involving acceptable  provider-patient relations between a particular panel of providers
and a particular eligible employee  or family member under a comprehensive group practice benefit
plan, the board shall provide a procedure under which  any eligible employee may apply at any time
to substitute another benefit plan for participation in a comprehensive group practice benefit plan.
(7) An eligible  employee who is retired is not required to participate in a health benefit plan
offered under this section in order to obtain dental benefit plan  coverage. The board shall establish
by rule standards of eligibility for retired employees to participate in a dental benefit plan.
(8) The board shall evaluate a benefit plan that serves a limited geographic region of  this state
according to the criteria described in subsection (1) of this section.
(9)(a) The board shall use payment methodologies in self-insured health  benefit plans of-
fered by the board that are designed to limit the growth in per-member expenditures  for
health services to no more than 3.4 percent per year.
(b) The board shall adopt policies and practices designed to limit the annual increase  in
premium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans to 3.4 percent.
(10) A carrier or third party administrator that contracts with the board to provide  or
administer a health benefit plan shall, at least once  each plan year, conduct an audit of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 19
health benefit plan enrollees’ continued eligibility  for coverage as spouses or dependents or
any other basis that would affect the cost of the premium for the plan.
(Limitation on benefit plan non-primary care rates)
SECTION 29.  ORS 243.256 is amended to read:
243.256. [(1) A hospital that  provides services or supplies under a benefit plan offered by the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board shall be reimbursed using  the methodology prescribed by the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 442.392 and may not be reimbursed for each service or supply provided. ]
[(2) This section  applies to hospital payments made by a carrier under a contract with the board
and to hospital payments made under a self-insurance program administered by a  third party admin-
istrator on behalf of the board. ]
(1) A  carrier that contracts with the Public Employees’ Benefit Board to provide to eli-
gible employees and their dependents a benefit plan that reimburses the cost of inpatient or
outpatient hospital services or  supplies shall reimburse a claim for the cost of a hospital
service or supply that is covered by, or is similar to a service or supply that is covered  by,
the Medicare program in an amount that does not exceed:
(a) For claims submitted by in-network hospitals, 200 percent of the  amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply; or
(b) For claims submitted by  out-of-network hospitals, 185 percent of the amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply.
(2) A self-insurance program administered by a third party administrator  that is offered
by the board to eligible employees and their dependents and that reimburses the  cost of in-
patient or outpatient hospital services or supplies shall reimburse a claim for  the cost of a
hospital service or supply that is  covered by, or is similar to a service or supply that is
covered by, the Medicare program in an amount that does not exceed:
(a) For claims submitted by in-network hospitals, 200 percent of the  amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply; or
(b) For claims submitted by  out-of-network hospitals, 185 percent of the amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply.
(3) A provider who is reimbursed in accordance with subsection (1) or  (2) of this section
may not charge to or collect from the patient or  a person who is financially responsible for
the patient an amount in addition to the reimbursement paid under subsection  (1) or (2) of
this section other than cost sharing amounts authorized by the terms of the health benefit
plan.
(4) If a carrier or third party administrator does not  reimburse claims on a fee-for-
service basis, the payment  method used must take into account the limits specified in sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section. Such payment methods include, but are not limited to:
(a) Value-based payments;
(b) Capitation payments; and
(c) Bundled payments.
[(3)] (5) This section does not apply to reimbursements paid by a carrier or third party admin-
istrator to [ a hospital that is not subject to the methodology prescribed by the  authority under ORS
442.392.]:
(a) A type A or type B hospital as described in ORS 442.470;
(b) A rural critical access hospital as defined in ORS 315.613; or
(c) A hospital:
(A) Located in a county with  a population of less than 70,000 on the effective date of this
2017 Act;
(B) Classified as a sole community  hospital by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 20
(C) With Medicare payments composing at least 40 percent of the hospital’s  total annual
patient revenue.
(6) This  section does not require a health benefit plan offered by the board to reimburse
claims using a fee-for-service payment method.
SECTION 30.  ORS 243.125 is amended to read:
243.125. (1) The Public Employees’ Benefit  Board shall prescribe rules for the conduct of its
business and for carrying out ORS 243.256. The  board shall study all matters connected with the
providing of adequate  benefit plan coverage for eligible employees on the best basis possible with
relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the  state and local governments. The board
shall design benefits, devise specifications, analyze carrier responses to advertisements for  bids and
decide on the award of contracts. Contracts shall be signed  by the chairperson on behalf of the
board.
(2) In carrying out its duties under subsection (1) of this section, the goal of the board shall  be
to provide a high quality plan of health and other  benefits for employees at a cost affordable to both
the employer and the employees.
(3) Subject to ORS chapter 183, the board  may make rules not inconsistent with ORS 243.105 to
243.285 and 292.051 to determine  the terms and conditions of eligible employee participation and
coverage.
(4)(a) The board shall prepare specifications, invite bids and do acts  necessary to award con-
tracts for health benefit plan and dental benefit plan coverage of eligible employees in  accordance
with the criteria set forth in ORS 243.135 (1).
(b) Premium rates established by the board for a self-insured  health benefit plan and
premium rates  negotiated by the board with a carrier that offers a health benefit plan to
eligible employees must take into account any reduction in the cost of hospital  services and
supplies anticipated to result from the application of ORS 243.256.
(5) The executive director of the board shall report to the Director  of the Oregon Health Au-
thority.
(6) The board may retain consultants, brokers or other advisory personnel when  necessary and,
subject to the State Personnel Relations Law, shall employ such  personnel as are required to per-
form the functions of the board. If the board contracts for actuarial or technical support to
manage the functions of the board, the board shall, no less than  every three years, solicit
invitations to bid and the proposals must include all of the following:
(a) An explanation of how the bidder has assisted other  clients in creating incentives to
improve the quality of care provided to enrollees;
(b) An explanation of how  the bidder will support the board’s efforts to maximize pro-
vider efficiencies and achieve more organized systems of care; and
(c) A description of the  bidder’s experience in assisting other clients in structuring con-
tracts that use risk-based networks of providers and alternative provider  reimbursement
methodologies.
SECTION 31.  ORS 243.879 is amended to read:
243.879. [ (1) A hospital that provides services or supplies under a benefit plan offered by the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall be reimbursed using the methodology prescribed by  the Oregon
Health Authority under ORS 442.392 and may not  be reimbursed for each service or supply
provided.]
[(2) This section  applies to hospital payments made by a carrier under a contract with the board
and to hospital payments made under a self-insurance program administered by a  third party admin-
istrator on behalf of the board. ]
(1) A  carrier that contracts with the Oregon Educators Benefit Board to provide to eli-
gible employees and their dependents a benefit plan that reimburses the cost of inpatient or
outpatient hospital services or  supplies shall reimburse a claim for the cost of a hospital
service or supply that is covered by, or is similar to a service or supply that is covered  by,
the Medicare program in an amount that does not exceed:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 21
(a) For claims submitted by in-network hospitals, 200 percent of the  amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply; or
(b) For claims submitted by  out-of-network hospitals, 185 percent of the amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply.
(2) A self-insurance program administered by a third party administrator  that is offered
by the board to eligible employees and their dependents and that reimburses the  cost of in-
patient or outpatient hospital services or supplies shall reimburse a claim for  the cost of a
hospital service or supply that is  covered by, or is similar to a service or supply that is
covered by, the Medicare program in an amount that does not exceed:
(a) For claims submitted by in-network hospitals, 200 percent of the  amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply; or
(b) For claims submitted by  out-of-network hospitals, 185 percent of the amount paid by
Medicare for the service or supply.
(3) A provider who is reimbursed in accordance with subsection (1) or  (2) of this section
may not charge to or collect from the patient or  a person who is financially responsible for
the patient an amount in addition to the reimbursement paid under subsection  (1) or (2) of
this section other than cost sharing amounts authorized by the terms of the health benefit
plan.
(4) If a carrier or third party administrator does not  reimburse claims on a fee-for-
service basis, the payment  method used must take into account the limits specified in sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section. Such payment methods include, but are not limited to:
(a) Value-based payments;
(b) Capitation payments; and
(c) Bundled payments.
[(3)] (5) This section does not apply to reimbursements paid by a carrier or third party admin-
istrator to [ a hospital that is not subject to the methodology prescribed by the  authority under ORS
442.392.]:
(a) A type A or type B hospital as described in ORS 442.470;
(b) A rural critical access hospital as defined in ORS 315.613; or
(c) A hospital:
(A) Located in a county with  a population of less than 70,000 on the effective date of this
2017 Act;
(B) Classified as a sole community  hospital by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services; and
(C) With Medicare payments composing at least 40 percent of the hospital’s  total annual
patient revenue.
(6) This  section does not require a health benefit plan offered by the board to reimburse
claims using a fee-for-service payment method.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 243.864 is amended to read:
243.864. (1) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board:
(a) Shall adopt rules for the conduct of its business and for carrying out ORS 243.879; and
(b) May adopt rules not inconsistent with ORS 243.860 to 243.886 to determine the  terms and
conditions of eligible employee participation in and coverage under benefit plans.
(2) The board shall study all matters  connected with the provision of adequate benefit plan
coverage for eligible employees on the best basis possible  with regard to the welfare of the em-
ployees and affordability for the districts and local governments.  The board shall design benefits,
prepare specifications, analyze carrier responses to  advertisements for bids and award contracts.
Contracts shall be signed by the chairperson on behalf of the board.
(3) In carrying out its duties under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the goal of the  board
is to provide high-quality health, dental and other benefit plans for  eligible employees at a cost af-
fordable to the districts and local governments, the employees and the taxpayers of Oregon.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 22
(4)(a) The board shall prepare specifications, invite bids and take  actions necessary to award
contracts for health and dental benefit plan coverage of eligible employees in accordance with  the
criteria set forth in ORS 243.866 (1).
(b) Premium rates established by  the board for a self-insured health benefit plan and
premium rates negotiated by the board with a carrier that offers a health benefit plan  to
eligible employees must  take into account any reduction in the cost of hospital services and
supplies anticipated to result from the application of ORS 243.879.
(c) The  Public Contracting Code does not apply to contracts for benefit plans provided under
ORS 243.860 to 243.886.  The board may not exclude from competition to contract for a benefit plan
an Oregon carrier solely because the carrier does not serve all counties in Oregon.
(5) The board may retain consultants, brokers or  other advisory personnel when necessary and
shall employ such personnel as are required to perform the functions of the board. If the board
contracts for actuarial or technical support to manage the  functions of the board, the board
shall, no less than every three years, solicit invitations  to bid and the proposals must include
all of the following:
(a) An explanation of how the  bidder has assisted other clients in creating incentives to
improve the quality of care provided to enrollees;
(b) An explanation of how the bidder will support the board’s  efforts to maximize pro-
vider efficiencies and achieve more organized systems of care; and
(c) A description of the bidder’s experience in assisting other  clients in structuring con-
tracts that  use risk-based networks of providers and alternative provider reimbursement
methodologies.
SECTION 33.  ORS 442.394 is amended to read:
442.394. (1) A hospital or ambulatory surgical center shall bill and accept  as payment in full an
amount determined  in accordance with ORS 243.256 and 243.879, if applicable, or  the payment
methodology prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 442.392.
(2) This section does not  apply to type A or type B hospitals as described in ORS 442.470 or
rural critical access hospitals as defined in ORS 315.613.
SECTION 34. (1)(a) The amendments to  ORS 243.125 by section 30 of this 2017 Act apply
to health benefit plans offered by  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board on or after January
1, 2018.
(b) The  amendments to ORS 243.135 and 243.256 by sections 27 and 29 of this 2017 Act
apply to health benefit  plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board for plan years
beginning after July 1, 2019.
(2)(a) The amendments  to ORS 243.864 by section 32 of this 2017 Act apply to health
benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board on or after January 1, 2018.
(b) The amendments to ORS 243.866 and 243.879 by sections 28 and 31 of this 2017  Act
apply to health benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board  for plan years
beginning after July 1, 2019.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 35. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 36. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 23
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1067 (SB 1067-A) Page 24